Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-1002
Legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature finds that it is in the interest of Nebraska to ensure its security against espionage, surveillance, and theft of intellectual property by the People's Republic of China and other hostile actors. It is the intent of the Legislature to limit the purchase of unmanned aircraft systems known to present a security threat to the state, its businesses, and its residents and to encourage the purchase of unmanned aircraft systems that are deemed secure.

Laws 2025, LB660, § 21.